Utah statutes.
16-10a-801.   Requirement for and duties of board of directors.
(1)  Except as provided in Section 16-10a-732, each corporation shall have a
board of directors.
(2)  All corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and
the business and affairs of the corporation managed under the direction of,
its board of directors, subject to any limitation set forth in the articles of
incorporation or in an agreement authorized under Section 16-10a-732.
